patterns/dehyphn-x-fugen-2019-11-19.pattern
-->
<-- preamble of dehyphn-x-fugen-2019-11-19.pat
%   1 1 | 2 5 | 1 1 1
%   2 2 | 2 5 | 1 2 1
%   3 3 | 2 6 | 1 1 1
%   4 4 | 2 6 | 1 4 1
%   5 5 | 2 7 | 1 1 1
%   6 6 | 2 7 | 1 6 1
%   7 7 | 2 13 | 1 4 1
%   8 8 | 2 13 | 1 8 1
.ab4
.abel2
.aben2
.abs2
.acht4f
.ad2
.af2
.aft2
.ag2
.akt2a
.al4
.all2
.all4e
.all4z
.alter6s
.alt3s
.alz2
.am2
.amt2
.an4
.and2
.an6g4
.angs2
.ank2
.ann2a
.anz2
.anzu2
.aos4
.ar4
.ark2
.arm3ac
.art3ei
.art5erh
.art1r
.as4
.au2
.auf4
.aufzu4
.aus4
.auss4
.auszu4
.ät2
.bak4
.be2
.bei4
.beizu4
.ben4
.bens2
.ber4
.berg3a
.berg5eb
.berge5s
.berg3r
.bes4
.bi2
.bier1
.bier3b
.bil2
.bis2
.bit1a
.blau3s
.bogen5s
.bor2
.bu2
.but2
.by2
.ce2
.ch2
.che2
.da2
.dach1
.dar2
.darm1
.datei3
.de2
.den2
.denk3l
.den3s
.der4b
.der2e
.der3ei
.der2m
.der4n
.der1s
.des2
.dien4
.dienst7ad
.do2
.dorf1
.dura1
.durch4
.eben1
.ed4
.eg2
.eh2
.ehe1b
.ehe1i
.ehe1n
.ehe1r
.eier1
.ei2f2
.ei3lan
.ein2a
.ein4br
.ein4er
.ein4gr
.ein4ha
.ein4he
.ein4ho
.ein2i
.ein4ku
.ein4l
.ein4mü
.ein2p
.ein6rah
.ein8steh
.ein8stimme
.ein8stimms
.ein8stimmt
.ein8stimmu
.ein8stür
.ein4tr
.ein2w
.eis3b
.ei3sch
.eisen3
.eis3h
.eis1s
.eis3t
.ei1z
.el6
.elb1l
.elb1s
.elch3t
.emm2
.em2s
.en4
.end3er
.end1r
.end3s
.enn2
.ent4
.enten3
.er4
.erd3er
.ern2
.ers2
.erz3el
.es2
.ese2
.est2a
.est6e
.et2
.eur2
.ex2
.fa4
.fe2
.fel2
.fer2
.fern3t
.fi2
.frei1
.frosch5
.früh3r
.ga2
.gas1e
.gd2
.ge6
.gegen4
.gegenzu8
.gel2
.gelb3r
.geld1
.gen2e
.gen4fe
.gen2o
.gen4r
.gen1t
.ger2
.ges2
.glas3t
.gleich7l
.go2
.gs2
.guss3
.haft3s
.hal4
.halt4e
.han4
.haus5g
.haus3z
.haut1
.he2
.hef2
.hel2
.hen4
.her4
.heran5
.herzu6k
.hi2
.hin2
.hinter6
.hip3s
.ho2
.hof1e
.hom1b
.ich1
.ide2
.ig2
.ih2
.il2
.im4
.imm2
.in4
.ind4
.ing2
.ink2
.inn2e
.ins4
.inter4
.inz2
.ir2
.is2
.it2
.iv2
.ka2
.kal2
.kal4k
.kalt3a
.kat4
.kauf5sc
.ke2
.kel2
.ken2
.ker2
.ki4
.ko4
.kom2
.kose1
.lab3w
.las2
.lau2f
.lauf3t
.lär2
.le2
.lei4
.lein3s
.len2
.ler2
.li2
.licht7ers
.lit2
.log3in
.lor2
.los4gi
.loss2
.lub2
.lug2
.lut2
.ma2
.mal4e
.mal2v
.mar4sc
.mas4
.mär2
.me2
.mee2
.mel2
.men2
.mer2
.mes4
.mi2
.mik2
.mo2
.ms2
.na2
.nacht5s
.nat2
.när2
.ne2
.neben4
.nei2
.nen2
.ner2
.neu5erb
.nicht5e
.nie2
.no2
.ob6
.oben2
.ober4
.of2
.oh2
.ohn2
.ohr3s
.om2
.on2
.op2
.or2
.ord4
.ort2
.orts3e
.ost1a
.ost3an
.ost3el
.ost5end
.oster5e
.ost1r
.ot2
.ott2
.ox2
.öd2
.öl1
.öl3b
.pa2
.par2
.pe2
.pel2
.pen2
.per4
.pf2
.pier2
.ps2
.ra2
.rach4e
.rad3s
.ran4
.rang3t
.ranzu4
.ras2
.raus4
.rauszu6
.re4
.reb1s2
.rei4
.rein6br
.rein4g
.rein8hole
.rein4k
.rein4l
.rein6zi
.rein8zu8b
.rein8zu8k
.reis6e5i
.rem2
.ren2
.res2
.richt6e
.rik2
.ro2
.roh1a
.rom2
.rom4a
.roß2
.ruf1s
.ruhr1
.rum2
.rück4
.rückzu6
.sam2b
.sch4
.schaft7end
.se2
.see1i
.sen6
.ser2
.si2
.sie2
.sig2
.so1ge
.son2
.st4
.stau8becken.
.ste2
.stein5g
.sten2
.ster4
.sus4
.ta2
.tages3
.tan4
.tank3a
.tank3l
.tat1h
.tat1u
.te4
.tei2
.teiler8s
.teil7ersc
.tel2
.ten2
.ter2
.tes4
.test3r
.ther2
.tie2r
.til2
.tisch7end
.tit4
.to2
.ton1
.tor1g
.tor1i
.trau3s
.ts4
.turm1
.uer4
.uh2
.ul2
.ull2
.um2
.um4l
.um4z
.umzu2
.un4
.unter4
.unter6f
.unterzu8
.ur6
.urs2
.us4
.über4
.va2
.val4
.ve2
.vel2
.ven2
.ver4b
.vil2
.vo2
.von2
.vor4
.vor6s
.vorzu4
.walt2
.weg2b
.weg8genom
.weg4h
.weg2k
.weg4na
.weg4zu
.wei2
.wer2
.wer4t
.wider4
.wie1f
.wind3l
.wo2h
.wort5en
.wurf1
.ze2
.zel2
.zer4
.ziel3u
.zin2
.zins3c
.zu2
.zug1l
.zuzu2
.zweig7end
a1ab
2aac
aa1do
aage1
a1akt
aal1di
aale1t
aal1t
a1an
a2ans
a1aq
2aar
aar1a
aar1b
aar1d
aar3f
aar3g
aar3k2
aar1l
aar1n
aar1r
aar1s
aar1ta
aar1th
aar1tr
aar1z
aas1t
aat3h
aat1r
aat2s1
2a3au
a1ä
a2ät
2aba
a2bak
ab1alt
ab2am
ab2ant
a2bat
ab1au
abau4t
2abä
a1bäu
ab2b
1abba
2abbat
2abbin
ab2dru
2abe.
abe1a
abe1b
a1bec
abe1d
abe1e
abe1f
abe1g
abe1he
abe1hi
abei1
ab1eic
ab1ein
abe1k
2a2bel
abel3a
abe3las
abel3in
abe3lis
abe1m
aben1s
aben1ü
aben1z
abe1o
abe1p
abe1q
aber1l
aber2m
aber2n
aber3we
4abes
abe1sa
abe1sä
abe1sc
abes1e
abe1sp
abe1st
2abet
abe1ta
2abe3v
2abe1w
abe1za
1abfä
1abfe
3ab2ga
ab2gl
ab2gr
2abi
4abil
ab1ins
a1bir
abi3st
a1bitt
ab2j
ab2k
3ab4ko
ab2lag
2ablea
3ablei
2ablet
ab1lin
2ablo
3ablö
2ablu
ab2m
1abn
ab2o
a1bog
1abon
abor1s
2abot
2abö
ab2ra
ab1ren
2a1bro
a1brö
a1brü
ab2sat
ab1sel
1ab2s2p
abs2t2
2abst.
ab2sta
ab2sto
2abt.
ab2te
2abu
abu1b
ab1um
2abü
1ab2w
2aby
1abz
2abzä
ab3zig
ab2zü
2ac.
2aca
1acc
2acci
2ach.
ach1a
ach3au
2achb
2ache
ach1ec
ache1f
ach3ein
ach5erfa
acher3g
ach3erh
ach3erw
4achf
ach1fö
2achi
ach1id
ach3imp
ach3lag
ach3lei
4achm
ach1mo
ach3mu
ach1ne
ach1ob
acho1g
ach1öf
ach1q
3achsa
4achsc
achs4el
achs2i
achs2k
ach3skr
ach3spe
ach5tale
acht5erw
ach5tren
acht4sa
acht5sag
ach1uf
ach1ü
4achw
ach1wi
ach1wo
ach1wö
ach1zw
acis3
2ack.
acken3s
ack4mu
ackmus3
2acks
ack3spi
ack3sta
2acl
2acu
2ad.
2ada.
ad1ama
ad1an
3adap
2ad2ar3
2adat
ad1au
ad1c
ad2d
ad3da
ad3dr
2ade.
ade1a
ade1b
ade1e
ade1f
2adeg
ade1k
2aden
aden3ti
ade1p
ade1ra
ader1l
ade1ro
ader1s
ade1s2
ade3str
ade1z
ad2fö
ad3he
2adi
adie2
adio1t
1adj
ad2ke
ad2o
a2doc
ad1rah
2ad1rec
ad1rei
a1drom
ad1run
2ads2
ad3sä
ad2sc
ad3st
ad3sz
adt1
2adu
1ad2v
ae2
a1ei
ael2s
a1em
a1ep
a1erh
aes4
a1et
a1ex
2afa
af1ab
a1fah
a1fall
af3an
af1art
af1au
2a1fä
af1än
af1br
af1d
2afe
af1ec
afen3b
af1ep
aff2a
af1far
af1fäl
af1fo
af1fr
af1g
af3h
2afi2
afie1i
a1fil
af1k
af1la
af1li
af1na
2afo
af1oc
afon2
af1ord
afo1s
2afra
af1rau
af1rä
af1re
2afro
af1rö
af1ru
af1s
afs2a
af2sc
af2si
af2s1p
af3su
aft1a
af1tat
af2te
aft1el
af2t1o
aft1r
aft5re
af3ur
2afü
a1füh
afür1
af1w
af1z
4ag.
2aga
ag1ab
ag1ad
ag1amb
ag1au
a1gä
ag1bl
agd1
4age.
age1a
age1b
age3ba
age3be2
age1c
age1d
age1e
age1f
age1g
age1h
age1i
age1k
2agel
age1la
age1li
age1lo
age1ma
age1mi
2agen.
agen5tes
age1or
age1p
age1q
ager1a
age3räu
age3rec
age3red
ager3h
age3ric
ager1l
ager1m
ager3sc
age3ruf
age1rü
2ages
a2gesa
age1sä
age1sc
ages3i
ages3p
age3spa
age1st
ages3ti
a2ge1t
age1w
age3z
ag3f
ag1geb
ag1gef
1ag2gr
ag1id
agie2
ag1im
2agl
ag1la
ag2lan
ag1lu
2agm
ag2ma
ag1na
ag2nat
ag1nä
2ago
a1gol
ag1rat
ag1re
ag1ri
ag1s4ah
ag1sc
ags4eid
ag1ste
ag4stei
ags3tr
2agt
ag3z
2ah
a1han
a1hä
ahe1b
ahe1in
ahe1l
aher1
ah1erh
aher3r
ahe1s
ahe1u
ah2i
ahin1
ahin3r
ahinter5
ahin3w
ah2j
ah4l
ahl3a
ahl1ä
ahl1ei
ahl1el
ahl3erd
ahl3erf
ahl3erh
ahl1o
ahl3sz
ahl4wei
4ah2m
ahme1i
ahme3s
ahn3a
ahn1c
ahn3erd
ahner4e
ahn3ern
ahn1f
ahn3he
ahn1l
ahn3r
4ahnt
ahn1th
a3hop
3ahor
ah1os
ah1ö
ahr1a
ahr2e
ahrer3t
ahr4tri
ah1sc
ah1se
ah1si
ah3steu
ah2te
aht1el
aht1ex
aht1h
ah1to
aht1r
aht1s6
aht1z
ah1wä
ah1z
2ai.
ai3a2
2aib
ai1ba
ai1bo
ai3bu
aid4s
aids1t
aien1
ai1fe
ai1fi
ai1fr
aig2
ai1gl
ai2j
ai1kr
ai1ku
ai1lan
ai1lä
ail3b
ail1d2
ail3g
ail3lis
ail1s
ail1t
ai1ma
ai2man
ai1mo
2ain
ai1nac
ain3b
a1ind
ain4e
ainer1
ain3geb
ain3k
ain2m
ain1s
ains2p
ain1t
ain1v
3airb
air1l
2ais
ai3schw
ais2e
ais3k
ai1spe
ait2
ai1ta
ai1tr
aiv2
ai2w
ai3wo
ai1za
aje2
ajekt4o
ak2
2akab
1akad
2akal
2akam
2a1kap
2akar
1akaz
4a1kä
ak3b
ak3c
2ake
ak3em
ak1ent
aket3z
ak3fe
ak3fr
ak3g
ak3h
2aki
ak3ins
1akku
2akl
ak3lö
1akn
ako2
a3koh
2akr
ak3res
ak4ri
3a2kro
2aks
ak3sc
ak3sh
ak3so
ak3ste
akt1ab
2aktb
akt2er
akter3z
2aktik
2aktis
2aktm
2akto
akt1r
2aktsi
2aktsp
2aktst
2aktw
1akup
2a1kü
ak3w
ak3zu
2al.
2ala.
al1ab
al1ad
al1af
al1age
al1akr
al1am
alami3s
alan4
al1ana
a3land
al1ans
al1anz
al1app
alar2
al3arc
2al3arr
al1asi
al1ass
alat1s
alat3z
al1au
al3auf2
al3aug
al3aus
al1äm
al1än
al1äu
al1ba
1albat
al3beit
alb3erh
alb3erw
al3bil
alb1l
alb1ru
alb1s
alb3st
al1ch
2ald
al2dac
al1dat
ald3erl
ald3ern
4aldi
ald3inn
ald1l
al1dü
2ale
al1eb
al1ec
ale2d
al3ef
a1leh
al1ei
al2eic
al3ein2
al1el
a3lenas
alender5
al3endr
al3ends
al1epo
aler1a
al1erb
al1erf
al1erg
al1erh
al3erl
aler5le
al1erm
al1err
al1ert
aler2w
al3erwä
al1esk
al1eu
al3exi
al1fe
alf2r
2alg.
al3gas
1alge.
2algi
alg1li
1algo
al1gu
al3he
al3ho
2ali
a1lief
al1imm
al1imp
al1ind
al1inq
al1ins
a2lis
alk3lic
alk1lö
al3kr
alk1s
al3kür
al3lag
all1an
all1ap
all1ar
all1au
1allee
all5elek
all3gef
1allia
all1id
4allin
al1lip
al1lit
all3k
al1log
al2lok
all3sc
al2lu
alm3ast
al1mi
al3n
al1ob
3aloe
al1ont
al1ort
al1ö
al3ör
al2ös
1alpe.
al3per
2al3pr
al3r
2als.
al1sc
alsch3s
al1sei
al2sh
als4ha
al1skl
als2te
al5sterb
alt1ak
alt1an
al2tat
alt3erf
alter5sc
alt1op
alt3rad
alt3rat
alt3ric
alt1ro
al1tur
alt3urs
al4tü
2alty
alu1b
alu1f
alu1g
al1uk
al1umb
al1ur
alut1s
2alw
4aly
al1zä
al1zie
al1zo
4am.
am2a
a1mac
a1mag
2amah
ama1k
1amal
a2mane
am3ap
2amar
am1bil
am1c
am1d
4ame.
ame1c
5ameisen
2amel
4am2en
amen1e
amen6spr
ament3r
amer2
am1erf
1amé
am1f
am1g
am1hi
ami2
amin1k
2a1mir
a1miss
2amit
ami3tak
4amk
am1la
am1le
am1li
2amm.
2ammal
amm3ang
amm1c
am2me2
ammes3
am2mo
am2mö
amm1r
4amo
am1ord
a2mö
am1pas
ampf1o
2ample
2am2po
am1ra
am1rö
am2sa
ams3b
am3sh
am1sp
am1str
ams2w
am2t
1amt.
amt1a
amt1ä
amt3eig
2amtem
2amten
2amter4
amt3ern
2amtet
amt1ex
amt3her
amt1r
amt1u
2amu
3amul
am1unt
a1mü
am1w
am2wa
an2
2an.
an3ab
an4ag
an3akt
anama3r
anama3z
2anan
an3ang
an3ant
ana3po
an3arb
anat1r
anat3sc
an3au
1anäs
1anb
an3beu
3an4bli
an3bus
4anc
anch2
2and
4and.
3and2ac
and3arm
an3dars
and1c
and3ei
and5erob
ande2s
andes5tr
and1ex
and3f
and3he
4andi
an3don
an4dra
4ands
and6spar
and6spas
and1ur
4andy
ane2
2ane.
an3eif
anein2
an3eis
1anek
2anel
an3emi
2anen
an3erf
aner1l
an3eth
an3ex
1anf
2anf.
2anfab
an3fes
2anfi
an3fig
an4ford
an3form
2anfs
anf2t
an3f2u
2anfü
4ang.
1anga
3an4gab
an3gas
an3gau
2ange.
an3gea
ang1ei
anger2
ang3erf
ang3erw
ang3erz
an5gesel
4angh
an4gie
an3gin
ang1la
ang1lä
an3gloc
ang1n
ang1ra
ang3red
1an4gri
4angs.
ang3str
angst5rä
ang1th
an3gum
an4heb
an3hol
an3hü
2ani
4ania
4anie
anig2
ani1ga
ani2l
3anim
an3imp
an3ind
anin3h
an3ins
3aniso
anis2t
a1niv
2anj
2ank.
ank1ak
an3kam
ank1an
an3kap
2anken
ank5erfa
2anki
2ankn
ank1no
an3kom
an3kon
ank3opf
an3kost
ank1ra
ank1rä
2anks
ank1se
anks2p
2ankt2
an4kü
1anl
2an3lad
an3län
an3lin
1anmah
an3man
an4mel
an4mer
an3met
1anmu
an3mus
2ann
3anna
an3nat
ann2g
ann2s1p
2ano.
ano1be
2anof
an3ofe
an3off
2anog
ano1k
ano2l
1anom
1anor
2anos
an3ph
an3pl
an3po
2anpu
an3rea
2anrö
1an4ru
ans2
2ans.
ans4a
an4sat
an6schla
an6schlä
an3ser
ans4ga
ans3h
2ansk
ans3ku
ans4te
1an4stu
4ant.
ant3arb
ant3b
4ante.
1antei
2antem
4anten.
2anter
anter5n
2antes
ant3f
1antib
2antie
3antise
ant3p
an4trä
ant3rin
2ants
ant3st
ant3t
an3uh
an3ums
an3unt
a2nus3
an3üb
an3vo
1anw
an4wal
an4wen
an3wet
an3wis
4anz.
anz1c
2anzd
1anzei
an3zeit
anz3elf
2anzen
anzer5fa
2anzh
anz1in
2anzk
2anzm
2anzp
2anzr
an4zug.
an4zugs
anzu2h
anzu4l
anzu2w
1anzü
an3züc
an4züg
2anzv
an3zy
2ao
ao1b
ao2l
ao1m
a1op
aos3
aot2
ao3ts
a1ö
ap2
2ap.
2apa
apa1b
a1pä
2ape
apel2w
1apfel
2apfes
a1pfl
apf1lo
a1phä
2apl
2apro
a3prot
apst1r
ap3to
2a2pu
2ar.
ara2b2
2ar1abb
ar1abf
ar1abt
arad2
ar1adr
2aran
aran3g
ar1an4r
aran3s
ar1anz
2arap
ar1app
ar3ar
a2ra2s
2ar1au
arauf1
araus4
ar3är
2arb.
2arba
ar2bac
ar3bal
arb1at
arb1au
ar1bea
4arbef
arb3ein
2arben
ar1ber
arb3erl
2ar1bes
ar1bez
2arbi
ar1bis
2arbl
2arbo
2arbr
arb1re
ar1brü
2arb1s
2arbt
arb1th
ar1bu
ar1bür
ar2ca
3archä
4archl
4ar1chr
arch3s
ar2cl
2ard
ar1dac
ar1dam
ar1dat
arde1f
arder4
ar1dö
ard1r
ar1drü
2are.
are1b2
a1rec
are1d
are1e
ar1eff
are1g
are1h
ar1ehr
4arei
a1reih
are1im
ar1ein
arein3f
are1k
2aren.
are3neu
aren1k
aren3so
are1p
are1r2a
ar3erei
ar1erg
ar1erh
ar1erk
ar1erl
are1s
are1te
are1u
are3v
ar1fa
ar1fi
ar1fl
ar1fo
ar1fö
arf1r
ar3füh
4arg.
arg2a
ar1gas
2arge
arg2h
2ar2g4o
argo3p
arg2r
ar1gro
ar1grü
ar1gü
2ar1h
ar2he
2ari
ar1im
ari3me
arin3st
ar1int
a1riv
ar2j
2ark
ar1kab
ar1kap
ark3aue
ar1käu
ark1c
ar2ki
ark1il
ar1kla
ark3lag
ark1le
ark1li
ar3koc
ar1kr
ark1s2a
ark3sc
ark3she
ark2t
ar1kul
1arl.
ar1lad
ar1lan
ar1lä
ar1lei
ar1lis
ar1lu
ar1lü
ar1mac
arma1l
ar3mang
arma3sc
2arm2ä
ar1mäc
ar1mäh
2armbr
arm1eg
arm1ei
ar1min
ar1mit
ar1mob
armor1
ar3mö
arm3unt
4armü
2arn
arn2el
aro1b
a1roch
ar1of
ar1op
ar1or
ar1ö
2arp
ar3par
ar3per
ar1pf
ar1ph
ar3pl
ar3pr
2arr.
arr1ac
arr1ad
ar1rag
arr1as
ar3reg
2arren
2arri
arr3or
2arrt
ar1ruh
ar1rum
2ars
4arsa
ar1sä
ar3schn
ar3schr
ars2h
ars4ha
4ar1s2i
ar2sk
ar2so
ar1sp
ar3sta
ar3steu
ar1str
ar3stu
ar1su
ar3tag.
art1au
2artb
art2e
2arte.
arter5hö
arter3k
art2i
4artig
ar3tip
art1la
2arto
art3ram
art3ren
art3rie
ar3trop
art1sc
arts2e
art3ske
art3w
art3z
2aru
ar1uh
arum2
a1rumm
ar1ums
ar1ü
2ar1v
ar2vi
